Connecticut, session 2026, HB05389.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) The Department of
Public Health, in consultation with The University of Connecticut
Health Center's Health Disparities Institute, persons who have
experienced symptoms of perimenopause, menopause and
postmenopause, and health care providers who treat persons with
symptoms of perimenopause, menopause and postmenopause, shall
develop a toolkit that provides practical, evidence-based and culturally
appropriate guidance to health care providers in the state who are
responsible for diagnosing or treating persons with symptoms of
menopause, perimenopause or postmenopause, as determined by the
commissioner, including, but not limited to, health care providers in the
fields of obstetrics, gynecology, internal medicine, family medicine,
emergency medicine, psychiatry, mental health, social work, dentistry,
dental hygiene and community health, regarding best practices for
screening, identification, clinical assessment, diagnosis and treatment of
symptoms of menopause, perimenopause and postmenopause. Such
guidance shall include, but need not be limited to, (1) a comprehensive
description of the symptoms of menopause, perimenopause and
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 5389
postmenopause, (2) evidence-based guidelines regarding the
identification and treatment of such symptoms, including, but not
limited to, the use of hormones, such as hormone replacement therapy
and testosterone therapy, (3) the availability of insurance coverage for
such therapies, and (4) short education modules regarding such
guidance that would qualify as continuing education for such health
care providers.
(b) Not later than June 1, 2028, the Commissioner of Public Health
shall distribute the toolkit developed pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section to such health care providers. Not later than January 1, 2029, the
commissioner shall (1) evaluate any feedback received from such health
care providers regarding the effectiveness of the toolkit, (2) revise the
toolkit as necessary to address such feedback, and (3) distribute a
revised toolkit, if any, to such health care providers.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
PH Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2